Utah statutes.
49-16-203.   Exemption of certain employees from coverage -- Exception.
(1)  A firefighter service employee serving as the chief of any fire
department or district is excluded from coverage under this system if that
firefighter service employee files a formal written request seeking exemption.
(2)  The chief of any fire department or district who retires from that
position shall comply with the provisions of Sections 49-11-504 and 49-11-505
upon reemployment by the participating employer.
